Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-375
Immunity from liability; when.

Any person participating in an investigation or the making of a report pursuant to the Adult Protective Services Act or participating in a judicial proceeding resulting therefrom shall be immune from any liability except (1) as otherwise provided in the Adult Protective Services Act, (2) for malfeasance in office or willful or wanton neglect of duty, or (3) for false statements of fact made with malicious intent.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 28.